Louisiana, session 2026, SB392.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 9:167.1 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§167.1. Filing claim based upon a purchase agreement; handling;
requirements; prohibitions
A. As used in this Section:
(1) "Executed" means a purchase agreement signed by all parties or any
amendment to a purchase agreement signed by all parties.
(2) "Purchase agreement" means a written document by which one
obtains or purports to obtain ownership of property of the seller that has been
Page 1 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-543 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 392
paid or delivered to the administrator by a holder, whether it be by purchase,
assignment, or any other kind of transfer excluding an order by a court of
competent jurisdiction.
(3) "Seller" means a person who sells, assigns, or otherwise transfers
property that has been paid or delivered to the administrator by a holder.
"Person" as used in this Section means a business association, partnership,
government, governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, public
corporation, or any other legal or commercial entity that is the owner of
property that is the subject of a purchase agreement.
B.(1) A purchase agreement shall be limited to property that has been
paid or delivered to the administrator by a holder as of the date the purchase
agreement was executed.
(2) Any portion of a purchase agreement that purports to transfer
ownership of property that is paid or delivered to the administrator by a holder
after the date the purchase agreement is executed shall be null and void as to
that property.
C. A purchase agreement for property held by the administrator shall
include the following information regarding each piece of property that is the
subject of the purchase agreement:
(1) The property identifying number as found in the records of the
administrator.
(2) A certified, updated search report from the secretary of state showing
that no UCC-1 financing statements are on file against the seller.
(3) The full legal name of the seller.
(4) The social security number or taxpayer identification number of the
seller, if a number has been issued to the seller.
(5) The name and last known address, email address, and phone number
of the seller.
(6) Any name that the seller was formerly known by, and proof of the
Page 2 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-543 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 392
name change.
(7) A copy of government-issued identification of the individual who
signed the purchase agreement on behalf of the seller.
(8) Documentation as required by the administrator evidencing that the
individual who signed the purchase agreement on behalf of the seller had the
authority to do so.
(9) The name and last known address, email address, and phone number
of the individual who signed the purchase agreement on behalf of the seller.
(10) The manual, handwritten, or wet signature of the individual who
signed the purchase agreement on behalf of the seller and the date signed as
affixed on the purchase agreement.
(11) The names and federal identification numbers of any subsidiaries
or affiliates of the seller and proof that the seller has the right to sell, assign, or
otherwise transfer the claims of the entities.
D. The administrator shall determine whether sufficient evidence or
documentation is provided to meet the requirements of Subsection C of this
Section to justify paying a claim.
E. An unredacted copy of a purchase agreement shall be submitted to the
administrator with the claim of a person seeking an interest in property
obtained by virtue of a purchase agreement.
F. The administrator shall deny any claim of a person who asserts
ownership of property by virtue of a purchase agreement that is not in
compliance with this Section.
Section 2. The provisions of this Act shall be effective on January 1, 2027.